Massachusetts, session 194th, S1821.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 94B the following section:-
"Section 94C. (a) “Post-traumatic stress disorder”, a disorder that meets the diagnostic
criteria for post-traumatic stress, as specified by the American Psychiatric Association in the fifth
edition of the Diagnostic and Statistics Manual of Mental Disorders, or most recently published
edition.
“Mental health professional”, a person with professional training, experience and
demonstrated competence in the treatment and diagnosis of mental conditions, who is certified or
licensed to provide mental health care services and for whom diagnosis of mental conditions are
of 3

within their scope of practice, including a physician, nurse with recognized psychiatric
specialties, psychiatrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, mental health counselor or alcohol
and drug abuse counselor.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary relative to the non-
contributory or contributory retirement system, any condition of impairment of health caused by
post-traumatic stress disorder diagnosed by a mental health professional resulting in total or
partial disability or death of: (1) a full-time uniformed member of a paid police department, paid
fire department, paid municipal emergency medical service department, the police department of
the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, the state police or the public works building
police, (2) any employee in the department of correction or a county correctional facility whose
regular or incidental duties require the care, supervision or custody of prisoners, criminally
insane persons or defective delinquents, (3) any permanent crash crewmen, crash boatman, fire
controlman or assistant fire controlman employed at the General Edward Lawrence Logan
International Airport, (4) the members of the 104th fighter wing fire department, or (5) members
of the Massachusetts military reservation fire department, shall, if they successfully passed a
physical examination on entry into said service, which examination failed to reveal any evidence
of said condition, be presumed to have been suffered in the line of duty, unless it is shown by a
preponderance of the evidence that the post-traumatic stress was caused by non-service
connected risk factors or non-service connected exposure.
(c) Any person first diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder within 5 years of the
last date on which said person actively served shall be eligible to apply for benefits pursuant to
this section, and if granted, said benefits shall be payable as of the date on which the employee
last received regular compensation.
of 3

(d) Post-traumatic stress disorder shall not be presumed to have been suffered in the line
of duty if it results from any disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff, demotion,
termination, resignation, retirement or similar bona fide personnel action taken in good faith by
the employer."
of 3